District of Columbia statutes.
31-3311.03

Loss ratio disclosure.

Policies, certificates, and marketing materials shall prominently display medical loss ratio disclosure, as defined by rule.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-360, § 104, 58 DCR 896